Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
DISSOLUTION AND ANNEXATION (SPECIAL CHARTERS)

31-12-301. Annexation to charter city.

When any city or town is contiguous to any city existing under any special charter of this state or the territory of Colorado, which charter was issued prior to July 3, 1877, and in such special charter it is provided that when any such city or town, in pursuance of any law of this state, is dissolved or becomes annexed to the city existing under a special charter and the area included within such city or town existing under general laws becomes part of the city existing under a special charter, the city or town may be annexed to and become part of the city existing under a special charter in the manner set forth in this part 3.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1093, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-201 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-302. Petition - order of court.

A petition signed by not less than twenty percent of the qualified taxpaying electors of such city or town for the dissolution of such city or town and the annexation of the same to the city existing under a special charter may be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court for the county in which the city or town is situated. The petition, or any part thereof, shall be accompanied by an affidavit of one or more of the petitioners showing that the signers are qualified taxpaying electors of such city or town and shall be prima facie evidence of the matters therein set forth. Upon the filing of such petition and upon the consent of the special charter city being shown by published ordinance, the district court shall make an order reciting the substance of the petition and requiring the governing body of such city or town to submit the question of such dissolution and annexation at the next regular election or at a special election of such city or town, as provided in section 31-12-305, to a vote of the registered electors thereof. The order shall be served by delivering a copy thereof to any member of the governing body of such city or town and shall be filed in the office of the clerk of such city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1093, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-202 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-303. Annexation consented to by ordinance - indebtedness.

No order shall be made by any district court requiring the submission of the question of dissolution and annexation to any election held pursuant to this part 3 until the city existing under a special charter to which it is proposed that such annexation be made has consented to such annexation by ordinance duly passed and published. In case of the annexation of any city or town to any city existing under a special charter, as provided in section 31-12-301, neither the indebtedness of the city or town so annexed nor that of the city to which the same shall be annexed shall become a common indebtedness. Such indebtedness shall be paid by general taxation upon all the taxable property within the city or town in and by which the indebtedness was created.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1094, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-210 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-304. School districts - annexation of area to another school district - applicability.

When the dissolution and annexation of any city or town under the provisions of this part 3 will result in the detachment of an area from any school district and the attachment of such area to another school district, no petition under section 31-12-302 is valid unless accompanied by a resolution of the board of directors of the school district to which such area will be attached approving such annexation. If there are any school facilities located within the detached area, the school district owning such facilities shall receive just compensation from the school district that acquires them. Such compensation shall be determined by mutual agreement of the school boards involved or in accordance with the applicable provisions of articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S. As used in this section, the term "facilities" is limited to school buildings and the real property on which they are situate. Any moneys received by a school district as compensation for such school facilities shall be treated as proceeds from sales of assets pursuant to section 22-45-112, C.R.S.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any annexation or dissolution and annexation proceedings which have not been completed prior to May 22, 1971.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1094, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-211 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-305. Question submitted to registered electors.

The governing body of such city or town shall, by ordinance and within a reasonable time to be fixed by the court in said order, direct that an election be held to submit the question of the dissolution and annexation to a vote of the registered electors. If the order of the district court is served more than thirty days and less than one hundred twenty days prior to the next regular election of such city or town, the question shall be submitted to a vote of the registered electors at such regular election; otherwise, the question shall be submitted at a special election to be called and held for that purpose. Such election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1094, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-203 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-12-306. Notice of election.

Notice of the submission of the question at a regular or special election shall be given by the clerk in the manner provided in the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965" and shall state the substance of the proposition as submitted by the ordinance. The clerk shall forthwith file in the office of the clerk of the district court a certificate under the seal of such city or town, containing a copy of said notice and specifying the time when and the places where such notices were posted and the newspapers in which said notices were published; and the same shall be prima facie evidence of the matters set forth therein.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1095, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-204 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-12-307. Ballots.

All ballots or voting machine tabs prepared for use pursuant to this part 3 shall contain the propositions "For Annexation" and "Against Annexation". If the question is submitted on paper ballots, such ballots shall be deposited in a separate ballot box used for that purpose only.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1095, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-205 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-308. Report - approval by court.

Following the canvass and certification of the results of the election, the clerk shall forthwith prepare a report, which shall be signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk under the seal of such city or town, containing a copy of the ordinance under which the question was submitted and of the certified statement and determination of the result of such vote, and he shall file said report in the office of the clerk of the district court.

The court shall examine the report and hear any objections and evidence that may be offered concerning the regularity or irregularity of the proceedings. If the court finds the proceedings irregular, the court shall disapprove said report and order a new election in accordance with the provisions of this part 3. If the court finds that the proceedings were substantially regular, the court shall approve the report. If a majority of the votes cast are against annexation, the question shall not again be submitted at any election held within twelve months thereafter. If a majority of the votes so cast are for annexation, from the approval of such report, such city or town shall be dissolved, and the area then included within the boundaries thereof shall be annexed to and become part of the city existing under a special charter upon the filing of two certified copies of notice of the completion of such action with a legal description accompanied by a map of the area concerned by the special charter city with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such action has taken place. The county clerk and recorder shall file the second certified copy of such notice with the division of local government of the department of local affairs, as provided by section 24-32-109, C.R.S. Appeals may be made from judgments of the district court in such proceedings as in other civil cases.

When residence or the payment of taxes is required by law as a qualification to vote or to hold office in the city existing under a special charter, residence and the payment of taxes in any area so annexed shall constitute such qualifications to the same extent as if the same had been in the city existing under a special charter during the same period.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1095, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-206 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-309. Termination of offices.

If the question so submitted is submitted at a regular election of such city or town and it appears from the canvass that a majority of the votes cast at such election upon the question are "For Annexation", all votes for officers of such city or town, or upon any other question submitted at said election, and all certificates of election issued in pursuance thereof shall be of no force or effect. In such case, upon the approval of the report by the district court, the terms of office of the dissolved city or town shall cease.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1095, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-207 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-310. Rights become property of city enlarged - utilities not curtailed.

When in pursuance of this part 3 any city or town is annexed to any city existing under a special charter, all rights, causes of action, records, uncollected revenues, and other property of the city or town so annexed shall accrue to and become the property of the annexing city. At least a proportionate share of the moneys of the annexing city available for water service, lights, and other public improvements shall be expended each year within the area formerly included within the city or town so annexed, based upon the valuation for assessment thereof. The water and light service of any city or town so annexed shall not be curtailed after such annexation.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1096, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-208 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-311. Validity not questioned after ninety days.

The validity of any proceeding to dissolve and annex any city or town by virtue of this part 3 shall not be questioned in any action or proceeding commenced more than ninety days after such dissolution and annexation is effected.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1096, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-209 as it existed prior to 1975.